Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.715

Homeless youth—Training program.

(1) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall establish a statewide training program on homeless youth for criminal justice personnel. The training must include identifying homeless youth, existing laws governing the intersection of law enforcement and homeless youth, and best practices for approaching and engaging homeless youth in appropriate services.

(2) The training must be provided where possible by an entity that has experience in developing coalitions, training, programs, and policy on homeless youth in Washington.

[ 2015 c 69 s 8.]